Ohio, session 136, SB441.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 5.2544 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 5.2544. The week beginning on the second Sunday in May is designated as "Maternal and Neonatal Sepsis Awareness Week" to increase awareness of the signs and symptoms of these life-threatening conditions, to share survivors' personal experiences, and to remember the lives lost to maternal and neonatal sepsis.